Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-3314
Grants; application; award.

An inland port authority located within the boundaries of a city of the metropolitan class may apply to the State Treasurer for grants to carry out the functions of such inland port authority as authorized under the Municipal Inland Port Authority Act. The application for such grants shall be submitted on a form prescribed by the State Treasurer. The application shall only include the amount of grant funds requested for each grant and a certified copy of the approved city ordinance creating such inland port authority. The State Treasurer shall not be required to verify the information submitted in the application. If adequate funds are available in the Inland Port Authority Fund, the State Treasurer shall award the grants.

Laws 2024, LB164, § 11.